Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-643
Cancer registry; terms, defined.

As used in sections 81-642 to 81-649.02, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in section 81-664 shall be used and:

(1) Cancer shall mean: (a) A large group of diseases characterized by an uncontrolled growth and spread of abnormal cells; (b) any condition of tumors having the properties of anaplasia, invasion, and metastasis; (c) a cellular tumor the natural course of which is fatal; and (d) malignant neoplasm. Cancer shall be deemed to include, but not be limited to, carcinoma, sarcoma, melanoma, lymphoma, Hodgkin's disease, and myeloma, but shall not include precancerous conditions, benign polyps, or benign tumors; and

(2) Cancer registry shall mean the system of reporting established by sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 in which the cases of cancer in this state are reported and recorded in order to achieve the goals of prevention, cure, and control of cancer through research and education.

Laws 1982, LB 212, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 69;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 114;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 29.